Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-186
Committee on Building Maintenance; meetings; duties.

The Committee on Building Maintenance shall meet as necessary, but not less than four times annually, to monitor the activities required of the task force and the agencies, boards, and commissions who are responsible for the state buildings and to review the proposed rental charges as provided in sections 81-1108.17 and 81-1108.22. The committee shall study progress and propose any necessary legislation to assure that state-owned buildings are protected through proper maintenance.

Laws 1977, LB 309, § 14;

Laws 1980, LB 835, § 9;

Laws 1982, LB 604, § 4;

Laws 1984, LB 838, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 530, § 3.